Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.664

[Art. 86] Absence without leave.

Any person subject to this code who, without authority:

(1) Fails to go to his or her appointed place of duty at the time prescribed;

(2) Goes from that place; or

(3) Absents himself or herself or remains absent from his or her unit, organization, or place of duty at which he or she is required to be at the time prescribed;

shall be punished as a court martial may direct.

[ 2011 c 336 s 777; 1963 c 220 s 85.]